Hawaii, session 2025, SB411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that state small boat harbors and state parks serve as vital hubs of recreation and tourism for residents and visitors alike.  However, facilities at these locations suffer from significant wear due to constant use and lack of timely repair, maintenance, and renovation. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Provide the division of boating and ocean recreation and the division of state parks the flexibility to undertake necessary repairs and renovations without the delay associated with legislative approvals; (2)  Limit the scope of expenditures to critical repairs, renovations, and replacements while excluding new construction; (3)  Establish a notification protocol to ensure that the legislature is informed of expenditures before they occur; and (4)  Establish annual reporting requirements to the legislature to ensure transparency and accountability. SECTION 2.  Section 103-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§103-7 Capital improvements; authorizations for; emergency repairs or reconstruction, [exception.] exceptions; small state boat harbors and state parks; report.  (a)  All capital improvement projects requiring the use of general funds, special funds, general obligation bonds, and revenue bonds of the State, except projects covered by subsection (b) and chapter 41D, shall require authorization by the legislature and the governor. (b)  Capital improvement projects for state small boat harbors and state parks for the repair, renovation, or replacement of existing facilities, including dredging, shall not require authorization from the legislature or governor; provided that an expenditure made under this subsection shall: (1)  Be strictly limited to major repairs, renovations, or replacements; and (2)  Not be used for the construction of new facilities or appurtenances. A department managing an expenditure made under this subsection shall issue a written notice to the legislature no later than fourteen business days before authorizing the expenditure. (c)  The department of land and natural resources shall submit a quarterly report that includes an account of the total quarterly expenditures incurred for any expenditure made under subsection (b); types of repairs, renovations, or replacements completed; justification for each expenditure; status of ongoing or planned projects; and detailed accounting of all capital improvement projects to the legislature. Each report for any quarter shall be due no later than the          day of the next quarter." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2491, and shall be repealed on the date five years after the effective date of this Act; provided that section 103-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which it read prior to the effective date of this Act.